Utah statutes.
49-21-403.   Termination of disability benefits -- Calculation of retirement
benefit.
(1)  An eligible employee covered by this chapter and eligible for service
credit under a system, or a participant in the Tier II Defined Contribution
Plan, created in Chapter 22, Part 4, Tier II Defined Contribution Plan, or
Chapter 23, Part 4, Tier II Defined Contribution Plan, including an eligible
employee who relinquishes rights to retirement benefits under Section
49-11-619, who applies and is qualified for a monthly disability benefit shall
receive a monthly disability benefit until the earlier of:
(a)  the date of the eligible employee's death;
(b)  the date the eligible employee is no longer disabled;
(c)  the date the eligible employee has accumulated:
(i)  20 years of service credit if the eligible employee is covered by Chapter
14, Public Safety Contributory Retirement Act, or Chapter 15, Public Safety
Noncontributory Retirement Act;
(ii)  25 years of service credit if the eligible employee is covered by
Chapter 17, Judges' Contributory Retirement Act, or Chapter 18, Judges'
Noncontributory Retirement Act;
(iii)  30 years of service credit if the eligible employee is covered by
Chapter 12, Public Employees' Contributory Retirement Act, or Chapter 13,
Public Employees' Noncontributory Retirement Act;
(iv)  35 years of service credit if the eligible employee is covered by the
defined benefit portion under Chapter 22, Part 3, Tier II Hybrid Retirement
System, or is covered by the defined contribution plan under Chapter 22, Part
4, Tier II Defined Contribution Plan; or
(v)  25 years of service credit if the eligible employee is covered by the
defined benefit portion under Chapter 23, Part 3, Tier II Hybrid Retirement
System, or is covered by the defined contribution plan under Chapter 23, Part
4, Tier II Defined Contribution Plan; or
(d)  the date the eligible employee has received a monthly disability benefit
for the following applicable time periods:
(i)  if the eligible employee is under age 60, the monthly disability benefit
is payable until age 65;
(ii)  if the eligible employee is 60 or 61 years of age on the date of
disability, the monthly disability benefit is payable for five years;
(iii)  if the eligible employee is 62 or 63 years of age on the date of
disability, the monthly disability benefit is payable for four years;
(iv)  if the eligible employee is 64 or 65 years of age on the date of
disability, the monthly disability benefit is payable for three years;
(v)  if the eligible employee is 66, 67, or 68 years of age on the date of
disability, the monthly disability benefit is payable for two years; and
(vi)  if the eligible employee is 69 years of age or older on the date of
disability, the monthly disability benefit is payable for one year.
(2) (a)  Upon termination of a monthly disability benefit, an eligible
employee eligible for service credit under a system may retire under the
requirements of the system which covered the eligible employee on the date of
disability.
(b)  The final average salary used in the calculation of the allowance shall
be based on the annual rate of pay on the date of disability, improved by the
annual cost-of-living increase factor applied to retirees of the system which
covered the eligible employee on the date of disability.
(3)  An eligible employee who is eligible for service credit in a system, but
has relinquished rights to an allowance under Section 49-11-619, may receive
the benefits the eligible employee would have received by being eligible for
service credit in the system covering the eligible employee on the date of
disability, except for the accrual of service credit, in accordance with this
title.
(4)  An eligible employee receiving a monthly disability benefit who has
service credit from two or more systems may not combine service credits under
Section 49-11-405 in qualifying for retirement, unless the eligible employee
would receive a greater allowance by combining the service credits.
(5)  A monthly disability benefit payable to an eligible employee who is not
eligible for service credit under a system shall terminate at the earliest of:
(a)  the date the eligible employee would be eligible for an unreduced
allowance;
(b)  the date the eligible employee has received a monthly disability benefit
for the applicable time period as set forth in Subsection (1)(c); or
(c)  the date the eligible employee receives a reduced allowance.
